District of Columbia statutes.
42-2804

Rules.

Rules to implement this chapter shall be promulgated by the Mayor pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, and submitted to the Council within 90 days after March 16, 1989 for a 45-day review period, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-202, § 5, 36 DCR 444

History

This section is referenced in § 42-2802.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 45-3104.

Prior Codifications

Resolutions

Resolution 14-579, the “Housing Production Trust Fund Regulatory Amendment Approval Resolution of 2002”, was approved effective October 18, 2002.

Resolution 16-393, the “Housing Production Trust Fund Regulatory Amendment Approval Resolution of 2005”, was approved effective November 26, 2005.